Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.200

Contribution rates for certain justices and judges—Public employees' retirement system.

(1) The required employer contribution rate in support of public employees' retirement system members employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.40.124(1) or 41.40.870(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall consist of the public employees' retirement system employer contribution rate established under this chapter plus two and one-half percent of pay.

(2) The required contribution rate for members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.40.124(1) or 41.40.870(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be two hundred fifty percent of the member contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system plan 2 established under this chapter less two and one-half percent of pay.

(3) The required contribution rate for members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.40.124(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be the contribution rate established under RCW 41.40.330 plus three and seventy-six one-hundredths percent of pay.

[ 2006 c 189 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.